Mississippi, session 2026, HB1370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In accordance with rules and other guidelines from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services: (a)  Nurse practitioners are authorized to serve as the certifying physician for the purpose of comprehensive management of a patient's diabetes if the nurse practitioner is practicing incident to the physician with whom the nurse practitioner has a collaborative relationship; and (b)  Nurse practitioners are authorized to prescribe therapeutic shoes, modifications and inserts for patients with diabetes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.